Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.290

Tests and data of products procured.

(1) This chapter does not require the department to test every product procured. However, the department may accept from businesses, manufacturers, organizations, and individuals results obtained from an accredited laboratory or testing facility documenting product or product packaging polychlorinated biphenyl levels.

(2) The department may request suppliers of products to provide testing data from an accredited laboratory or testing facility documenting product or product packaging polychlorinated biphenyl levels.

[ 2014 c 135 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2014 c 135: See note following RCW 39.26.280.